Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-412 Deposit in lieu. In lieu of
the bond, the attorney may maintain on deposit with the commissioner a like
amount in cash or in value of securities qualified under this code as insurers'
investments, and subject to the same conditions as the bond. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next